District of Columbia statutes.
29-307.04

Surrender of charter upon domestication.

(a)

Whenever a domestic business corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by this subchapter, a plan of domestication providing for the corporation to be domesticated in a foreign jurisdiction, articles of charter surrender shall be signed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender shall set forth:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the domestication of the corporation in a foreign jurisdiction;

(3)

A statement that the domestication was duly approved by the shareholders and, if voting by any separate voting group was required, by each such separate voting group, in the manner required by this chapter and the articles of incorporation; and

(4)

The corporation’s new jurisdiction of incorporation.

(b)

The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the Mayor for filing. The articles of charter surrender shall be effective on the effective time provided in § 29-102.03.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720